Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-143
Railroads; location, grade, and crossing; regulation.

A city of the second class shall have the power to provide for and change the location, grade, and crossing of any railroad.

Laws 1881, c. 24, § 1, p. 197;

R.S.1913, § 5037;

C.S.1922, § 4206;

C.S.1929, § 17-145;

R.S.1943, § 17-143;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 35.